Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6860YC (4) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.231, subsection 2, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 The driver of any an authorized emergency vehicle or peace 3 officer riding a police bicycle in the line of duty , may: 4 Sec. 2. Section 321.231, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraphs: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop 7 sign, but only after slowing down to or maintaining a speed 8 deemed necessary for safe operation by the driver based on 9 information known to the driver at the time. 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. Exceed the maximum speed limits so long 11 as the driver does not recklessly endanger life or property. 12 Sec. 3. Section 321.231, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 13 by striking the subsection. 14 Sec. 4. Section 321.231, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 5. a. The exemptions granted to the driver of an authorized 17 emergency vehicle under subsection 2 and to the driver of 18 an official fire department vehicle, police vehicle, rescue 19 vehicle, ambulance, emergency medical services vehicle, or 20 emergency management vehicle as provided in subsection 3 shall 21 apply only when such vehicle is making use of an audible 22 warning device meeting the requirements of section 321.433 or a 23 visual signaling device authorized under this chapter . 24 b. The exemption granted under subsection 3 2 , paragraph 25 âbâ âgâ , shall be granted to a peace officer or reserve peace 26 officer operating an authorized emergency vehicle without using 27 an audible warning device or visual signaling device if such 28 action occurs over the shortest distance necessary, does not 29 recklessly endanger persons or property, and if the officer 30 is pursuing a suspected violator of the speed restrictions 31 imposed by or pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of 32 determining the speed of travel of such suspected violator, 33 or if the officer reasonably believes based on the facts and 34 circumstances at the time that a suspected violatorâs knowledge 35 -1- LSB 6860YC (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ of the officerâs proximity may cause the suspected violator 1 to destroy evidence of a suspected felony or aggravated 2 misdemeanor, evade apprehension, or endanger the public or the 3 officer. 4 c. The exemption granted under subsection 3 2 , paragraph 5 âbâ âgâ , shall be granted to the driver of an authorized 6 emergency vehicle transporting a patient to a hospital without 7 using a visual signaling device or audible warning device if a 8 certified emergency medical care provider reasonably believes 9 the patientâs condition warrants rapid transport. 10